Illinois, session 104th, HB2181.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Comprehensive Health Insurance Plan Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 105/1)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1301)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Comprehensive Health Insurance Plan Act.9(Source: P.A. 84-1478.)